Utah statutes.
77-7-16.   Authority of peace officer to frisk suspect for dangerous weapon
-- Grounds.
A peace officer who has stopped a person temporarily for questioning may frisk
the person for a dangerous weapon if he reasonably believes he or any other
person is in danger.
